Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF962.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.7802, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6a. new text end new text begin Athletic training. new text end new text begin For the purpose of treating emergent, acute, and chronic injuries and nonorthopedic conditions, "athletic training" means the following actions when performed within the training and experience of the athletic trainer pursuant to section 148.7806, paragraph (c): new text end new text begin (1) prevention and wellness promotion; new text end new text begin (2) risk management; new text end new text begin (3) immediate and emergency care; new text end new text begin (4) examination, assessment, and diagnosis of a condition for which treatment is included in the training and experience of the athletic trainer as required in section 148.7806, paragraph (c); new text end new text begin (5) therapeutic interventions, rehabilitation, and reconditioning; new text end new text begin (6) clinical decision-making to determine if a consultation or referral is necessary; new text end new text begin (7) health care administration; and new text end new text begin (8) maintenance of professional responsibility. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.7806, is amended to read: 148.7806 ATHLETIC TRAINING. deleted text begin Athletic training by a licensed athletic trainer under section 148.7808 includes the activities described in paragraphs (a) to (e). deleted text end (a) An athletic trainer shalldeleted text begin :deleted text end new text begin perform athletic training, as defined in section 148.7802, subdivision 6a, under the direction of, on the prescription of, or in collaboration with a primary physician who is licensed in Minnesota to practice medicine, as defined in section 147.081, and whose license is in good standing.new text end deleted text begin (1) prevent, recognize, and evaluate athletic injuries; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) give emergency care and first aid; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) manage and treat athletic injuries; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4) rehabilitate and physically recondition athletic injuries. deleted text end deleted text begin Thedeleted text end new text begin (b) Annew text end athletic trainer deleted text begin may use modalities such as cold, heat, light, sound, electricity, exercise, and mechanical devicesdeleted text end new text begin must use therapeutic interventions within the training and experience of the athletic trainer pursuant to paragraph (c)new text end for treatment and rehabilitation of deleted text begin athletic injuries to athletes in the primary employment sitedeleted text end new text begin a patientnew text end . deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The primary physician shall establish evaluation and treatment protocols to be used by the athletic trainer. The primary physician shall record the protocols on a form prescribed by the board. The protocol form must be updated yearly at the athletic trainer's license renewal time and kept on file by the athletic trainer. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end At the primary employment site, deleted text begin except in a corporate setting,deleted text end an athletic trainer may evaluate and treat deleted text begin an athlete for an athletic injurydeleted text end new text begin a patientnew text end not previously diagnosed for not more than 30 daysdeleted text begin , or a period of time as designated by the primary physician on the protocol form,deleted text end from the date of the initial evaluation and treatment. deleted text begin Preventative care after resolution of the injury isdeleted text end new text begin Prevention, wellness, education, exercise, and reconditioning arenew text end not considered treatment. This paragraph does not apply to a person who is referred for treatment by a person licensed in this state to practice medicine as defined in section 147.081deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end to practice chiropractic as defined in section 148.01deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ; to practice physical therapy as defined in section 148.65, except as provided under paragraph (f);new text end to practice podiatry as defined in section 153.01deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or to practice dentistry as defined in section 150A.05new text begin ,new text end and whose license is in good standing. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end An athletic trainer may: (1) organize and administer an athletic training programnew text begin ,new text end includingdeleted text begin ,deleted text end but not limited todeleted text begin ,deleted text end educating and counseling deleted text begin athletesdeleted text end new text begin patientsnew text end ; (2) monitor the signs, symptoms, general behavior, and general physical response of deleted text begin an athletedeleted text end new text begin a patientnew text end to treatment and rehabilitationnew text begin ,new text end includingdeleted text begin ,deleted text end but not limited todeleted text begin ,deleted text end whether the signs, symptoms, reactions, behavior, or general response show abnormal characteristicsnew text begin that require a change in the plan of care or a referralnew text end ; and (3) make suggestions to the primary physician or other treating provider for a modification in the treatment and rehabilitation of deleted text begin an injured athletedeleted text end new text begin a patientnew text end based on the indicators in clause (2). deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end In a clinical, corporate, and physical therapy setting, when the service provided is, or is represented as being, physical therapy, an athletic trainer may work only under the direct supervision of a physical therapist as defined in section 148.65. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.7807, is amended to read: 148.7807 LIMITATIONS ON PRACTICE. new text begin (a) An athletic trainer must not practice or claim to practice medicine as defined in section 147.081; acupuncture as defined in section 147B.01; chiropractic as defined in section 148.01; physical therapy as defined in section 148.65, except as provided under section 148.7806, paragraph (f); podiatry as defined in section 153.01; occupational therapy as defined in section 148.6404; or any other licensed or registered health care profession, unless the athletic trainer also holds the appropriate license or registration to practice that profession. new text end new text begin (b) new text end If an athletic trainer determines that a patient's medical condition is deleted text begin beyonddeleted text end new text begin outsidenew text end the scope of practice of that athletic trainer, the athletic trainer must refer the patient to a person licensed in this state to practice medicine as defined in section 147.081deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end to practice chiropractic as defined in section 148.01deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ; to practice physical therapy as defined in section 148.65, except as provided under section 148.7806, paragraph (f);new text end to practice podiatry as defined in section 153.01deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or to practice dentistry as defined in section 150A.05new text begin ,new text end and whose license is in good standing and in accordance with established evaluation and treatment protocols. An athletic trainer shall modify or terminate treatment of a patient that is not beneficial to the patient, or that is not tolerated by the patient. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.7814, is amended to read: 148.7814 APPLICABILITY. Sections 148.7801 to 148.7815 do not apply to deleted text begin persons who are certified asdeleted text end new text begin annew text end athletic deleted text begin trainersdeleted text end new text begin trainer who is in Minnesota temporarily with an individual or group that is participating in a specific athletic event or series of athletic events if the athletic trainer is licensed, certified, or registered by another state or county, or is certified as an athletic trainernew text end by the Board of Certification or the board's recognized successor deleted text begin and come into Minnesota for a specific athletic event or series of athletic events with an individual or groupdeleted text end . Sec. 5. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.7802, subdivisions 4 and 5, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-01796 148.7802 DEFINITIONS. Subd. 4. Athlete. "Athlete" means a person participating in exercises, sports, games, or recreation requiring physical strength, agility, flexibility, range of motion, speed, or stamina. Subd. 5. Athletic injury. "Athletic injury" means an injury sustained by a person as a result of the person's participation in exercises, sports, games, or recreation requiring physical strength, agility, flexibility, range of motion, speed, or stamina.